Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9016

Labeling—Required information—Recordkeeping—Rules.

(1) Any commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, distributed in this state must be accompanied by a legible label bearing the following information:

(a) The product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is distributed.

(b) The guaranteed analysis stated in such terms as the department by rule determines is required to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases the substances or elements must be determinable by laboratory methods such as the methods published by the association of official analytical chemists.

(c) The common or usual name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed, except as the department may, by regulation, permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients all of which perform the same function. An ingredient statement is not required for single standardized ingredient feeds which are officially defined.

(d) The name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for distributing the commercial feed.

(e) Adequate directions for use for all commercial feeds containing drugs and for all such other commercial feeds as the department may require by rule as necessary for their safe and effective use.

(f) Those precautionary statements the department by rule determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed.

(g) The net weight as required under chapter 19.94 RCW.

(2) When a commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, is distributed in this state in bags or other containers, the label must be placed on or affixed to the container; when a commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, is distributed in bulk the label must accompany delivery and be furnished to the purchaser at time of delivery.

(3) A customer-formula feed must be labeled by shipping document. The shipping document, which is to accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at the time of delivery, must bear the following information:

(a) Name and address of the manufacturer;

(b) Name and address of the purchaser;

(c) Date of delivery;

(d) Product name and the net weight as required under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(e) Adequate directions for use for all customer-formula feeds containing drugs and for such other feeds as the department may require by rule as necessary for their safe and effective use;

(f) The directions for use and precautionary statements as required by subsection (1)(e) and (f) of this section; and

(g) If a drug containing product is used:

(i) The purpose of the medication (claim statement);

(ii) The established name of each active drug ingredient and the level of each drug used in the final mixture expressed in accordance with rules established by the department.

(4) The product name and quantity statement of each commercial feed and each other ingredient used in the customer formula feed must be on file at the plant producing the product. These records must be kept on file for one year after the last sale. This information must be made available to the purchaser, the dealer making the sale, and the department on request.

[ 2005 c 18 s 6; 1995 c 374 s 37; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.